Washington statutes.
RCW 29B.10.320

Intermediary. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

(1) "Intermediary" means an individual who transmits a contribution to a candidate or committee from another person unless the contribution is from the individual's employer, immediate family, or an association to which the individual belongs.

(2) A treasurer or a candidate is not an intermediary for purposes of the committee that the treasurer or candidate serves.

(3) A professional fund-raiser is not an intermediary if the fund-raiser is compensated for fund-raising services at the usual and customary rate.

(4) A volunteer hosting a fund-raising event at the individual's home is not an intermediary for purposes of that event.

[ 2024 c 164 s 232.]

NOTES:

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.